Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-5203
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Beginning Farmer Tax Credit Act:

(1) Agricultural assets means agricultural land, livestock, farming, or livestock production facilities or buildings and machinery used for farming or livestock production located in Nebraska;

(2) Board means the Beginning Farmer Board created by section 77-5204;

(3) Cash rent agreement means a rental agreement in which the principal consideration given to the owner of agricultural assets is a predetermined amount of money. A flex or variable rent agreement is an alternative form of a cash rent agreement in which a predetermined base rent is adjusted for actual crop yield, crop price, or both according to a predetermined formula;

(4) Farm means any improved or unimproved tract of land used for or devoted to the commercial production of farm products;

(5) Farm product means those plants and animals useful to man and includes, but is not limited to, forages and sod crops, grains and feed crops, dairy and dairy products, poultry and poultry products, livestock, including breeding and grazing livestock, fruits, and vegetables;

(6) Farming or livestock production means the active use, management, and operation of real and personal property for the production of a farm product;

(7) Financial management program means a program for beginning farmers or livestock producers which includes, but is not limited to, assistance in the creation and proper use of record-keeping systems, periodic private consultations with licensed financial management personnel, year-end monthly cash flow analysis, and detailed enterprise analysis;

(8) Owner of agricultural assets means:

(a) An individual or a trustee having an ownership interest in an agricultural asset located within the State of Nebraska who meets any qualifications determined by the board;

(b) A spouse, child, or sibling who acquires an ownership interest in agricultural assets as a joint tenant, heir, or devisee of an individual or trustee who would qualify as an owner of agricultural assets under subdivision (8)(a) of this section; or

(c) A partnership, corporation, limited liability company, or other business entity having an ownership interest in an agricultural asset located within the State of Nebraska which meets any additional qualifications determined by the board;

(9) Qualified beginning farmer or livestock producer means an individual who is a resident individual as defined in section 77-2714.01, who has entered farming or livestock production or is seeking entry into farming or livestock production, who intends to farm or raise crops or livestock on land located within the state borders of Nebraska, and who meets the eligibility guidelines established in section 77-5209 and such other qualifications as determined by the board; and

(10) Share-rent agreement means a rental agreement in which the principal consideration given to the owner of agricultural assets is a predetermined portion of the production of farm products from the rented agricultural assets.

Laws 1999, LB 630, § 4;

Laws 2000, LB 1223, § 3;

Laws 2006, LB 990, § 9;

Laws 2008, LB1027, § 3;

Laws 2019, LB560, § 2;

Laws 2023, LB562, § 13.